Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.020

Parents, guardians, etc., may act for minors, persons under guardianship or conservatorship.

Writs of habeas corpus shall be granted in favor of parents, guardians, limited guardians where appropriate, spouses or domestic partners, and next of kin, and to enforce the rights, and for the protection of minors and persons who have been placed under a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or under a conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360; and the proceedings shall in all cases conform to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2020 c 312 s 704; 2008 c 6 s 801; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 17; Code 1881 s 688; 1877 p 141 s 692; 1869 p 159 s 628; 1854 p 214 s 456; RRS s 1064.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.